src/fst/morphology/stems/ojibwe_verbs.lexc
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+XSubj+3PlObvObj:imind EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+XSubj+3PlProxObj:indwaa EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+XSubj+3SgObvObj:imind EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+XSubj+3SgProxObj:ind EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+XSubj+ExclObj:igooyaang EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+XSubj+InclObj:igooyang EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+XSubj+InclObj:igooying EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+%0PlSubj+1SgObj:igoyaambaan EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+%0PlSubj+2PlObj:igoyegiban EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+%0PlSubj+2SgObj:igoyamban EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+%0PlSubj+3PlObvObj:igonipan EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+%0PlSubj+3PlProxObj:igowaapan EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+%0PlSubj+3SgObvObj:igonipan EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+%0PlSubj+3SgProxObj:igopan EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+%0PlSubj+ExclObj:igoyaangiban EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+%0PlSubj+InclObj:igoyangiban EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+%0SgSubj+1SgObj:igoyaambaan EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+%0SgSubj+2PlObj:igoyegiban EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+%0SgSubj+2SgObj:igoyamban EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+%0SgSubj+3PlObvObj:igonipan EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+%0SgSubj+3PlProxObj:igowaapan EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+%0SgSubj+3SgObvObj:igonipan EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+%0SgSubj+3SgProxObj:igopan EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+%0SgSubj+ExclObj:igoyaangiban EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+%0SgSubj+InclObj:igoyangiban EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+1SgSubj+2PlObj:inagoogoban EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+1SgSubj+2SgObj:inaambaan EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+1SgSubj+3PlObvObj:imagiban EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+1SgSubj+3PlProxObj:agwaaban EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+1SgSubj+3SgObvObj:imagiban EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+1SgSubj+3SgProxObj:agiban EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2PlSubj+1SgObj:i1yegiban EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2PlSubj+3PlObvObj:imegiban EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2PlSubj+3PlProxObj:egwaaban EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2PlSubj+3SgObvObj:imegiban EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2PlSubj+3SgProxObj:egiban EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2PlSubj+ExclObj:i1yaangiban EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2SgSubj+1SgObj:i1yamban EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2SgSubj+3PlObvObj:imadiban EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2SgSubj+3PlProxObj:adwaaban EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2SgSubj+3SgObvObj:imadiban EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2SgSubj+3SgProxObj:adiban EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2SgSubj+ExclObj:i1yaangiban EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3PlObvSubj+3PlProxObj:igowaapan EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3PlObvSubj+3SgProxObj:igopan EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3PlProxSubj+1SgObj:i1waapan EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3PlProxSubj+2SgObj:inegwaaban EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3PlProxSubj+3PlObvObj:aawaapan EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3PlProxSubj+3SgObvObj:aawaapan EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3PlProxSubj+ExclObj:i1yangidwaaban EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3PlProxSubj+ExclObj:igooyaangiban EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3PlProxSubj+InclObj:inangwaaban EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgObvSubj+3PlProxObj:igowaapan EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgObvSubj+3SgProxObj:igopan EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgProxSubj+1SgObj:i1pan EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgProxSubj+2PlObj:igooyamban EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgProxSubj+2SgObj:inegiban EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgProxSubj+3PlObvObj:aapan EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgProxSubj+3SgObvObj:aapan EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgProxSubj+ExclObj:i1yangidiban EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgProxSubj+ExclObj:igooyaangiban EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgProxSubj+InclObj:inangiban EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+ExclSubj+2PlObj:igooyegiban EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+ExclSubj+2SgObj:igooyaniban EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+ExclSubj+3PlObvObj:imangidiban EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+ExclSubj+3PlProxObj:angidwaaban EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+ExclSubj+3SgObvObj:imangidiban EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+ExclSubj+3SgProxObj:angidiban EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+InclSubj+3PlObvObj:imangiban EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+InclSubj+3PlProxObj:angwaaban EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+InclSubj+3SgObvObj:imangiban EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+InclSubj+3SgProxObj:angiban EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+XSubj+1SgObj:igooyaambaan EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+XSubj+2PlObj:igooyegiban EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+XSubj+2SgObj:igooyamban EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+XSubj+3PlObvObj:imindiban EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+XSubj+3PlProxObj:indwaaban EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+XSubj+3SgObvObj:imindiban EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+XSubj+3SgProxObj:indiban EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+XSubj+ExclObj:igooyaangiban EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+XSubj+InclObj:igooyangiban EncliticRoot ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: VTA, Class: VTA_n                                          !
!         Morpheme boundary between stem and suffix                            !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON VTA_Class=VTA_n_Boundary
+VTA+Recip/di:0%>%>idi VAI_Class=VAI_rcp_Boundary ;
+VTA+Reflex/dizo:0%>%>idizo VAI_Class=VAI_rfx_Boundary ;
0:%>%> VTA_Class=VTA_n_Flags ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: VTA, Class: VTA_n                                          !
!         Flag diacritic governing combinations between                        !
!         prefix and ending                                                    !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON VTA_Class=VTA_n_Flags
@R.Prefix.%<CHCNJ%>@ VTA_Class=VTA_n_Flags_Prefix=%<CHCNJ%> ;
@R.Prefix.GAA-@ VTA_Class=VTA_n_Flags_Prefix=GAA- ;
@R.Prefix.GI@ VTA_Class=VTA_n_Flags_Prefix=GI ;
@R.Prefix.NI@ VTA_Class=VTA_n_Flags_Prefix=NI ;
@R.Prefix.NONE@ VTA_Class=VTA_n_Flags_Prefix=NONE ;
@R.Prefix.O@ VTA_Class=VTA_n_Flags_Prefix=O ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: VTA, Class: VTA_n                                          !
!         Flag diacritic governing combinations between                        !
!         prefix and ending_Prefix=NONE                                        !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON VTA_Class=VTA_n_Flags_Prefix=NONE
@U.Order.Cnj@ VTA_Class=VTA_n_Prefix=NONE_Order=Cnj_Endings ;
@U.Order.Ind@ VTA_Class=VTA_n_Prefix=NONE_Order=Ind_Endings ;
@U.Order.Other@ VTA_Class=VTA_n_Prefix=NONE_Order=Other_Endings ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: VTA, Class: VTA_n, Prefix: NONE, Order: Cnj                !
!         Endings                                                              !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON VTA_Stems
aadisookaazh:aadisookaan1 VTA_Class=VTA_n_Boundary ;
aanikoogwaazh:aanikoogwaan1 VTA_Class=VTA_n_Boundary ;
aate-boodaazh:aate-boodaan1 VTA_Class=VTA_n_Boundary ;
aazhawidikomaazh:aazhawidikomaan1 VTA_Class=VTA_n_Boundary ;
agaasadekozh:agaasadekon1 VTA_Class=VTA_n_Boundary ;
agwaa'oozh:agwaa'oon1 VTA_Class=VTA_n_Boundary ;
akwaandawedaabaazh:akwaandawedaabaan1 VTA_Class=VTA_n_Boundary ;
andoshkoozh:andoshkoon1 VTA_Class=VTA_n_Boundary ;
animiwizh:animiwin1 VTA_Class=VTA_n_Boundary ;
asabishkoozh:asabizhoon1 VTA_Class=VTA_n_Boundary ;
atwaaganikaazh:atwaaganikaan1 VTA_Class=VTA_n_Boundary ;
azhewizh:azhewin1 VTA_Class=VTA_n_Boundary ;
baakininjiibizh:baakininjiibin1 VTA_Class=VTA_n_Boundary ;
baashkiwiinzhinaabizh:baashkiwiinzhinaabin1 VTA_Class=VTA_n_Boundary ;
babaamaawazh:babaamaawan1 VTA_Class=VTA_n_Boundary ;
bagama'anazh:bagama'anan1 VTA_Class=VTA_n_Boundary ;
bagwanebizh:bagwanebin1 VTA_Class=VTA_n_Boundary ;
bakizh:bakin1 VTA_Class=VTA_n_Boundary ;
bakwenishkoozh:bakwenishkoon1 VTA_Class=VTA_n_Boundary ;
basaakoganzhaazh:basaakoganzhaan1 VTA_Class=VTA_n_Boundary ;
bazgwaawiganebizh:bazgwaawiganebin1 VTA_Class=VTA_n_Boundary ;
biida'azh:biida'an1 VTA_Class=VTA_n_Boundary ;
biijidaabaazh:biijidaabaan1 VTA_Class=VTA_n_Boundary ;
biindaabaawazh:biindaabaawan1 VTA_Class=VTA_n_Boundary ;
biinjigaade'oozh:biinjigaade'oon1 VTA_Class=VTA_n_Boundary ;
biiwiboozh:biiwiboon1 VTA_Class=VTA_n_Boundary ;
bimawaawazh:bimawaawan1 VTA_Class=VTA_n_Boundary ;
binagikozh:binagikon1 VTA_Class=VTA_n_Boundary ;
bishigobizh:bishigobin1 VTA_Class=VTA_n_Boundary ;
bizigiigibizh:bizigiigibin1 VTA_Class=VTA_n_Boundary ;
bookoningwiibizh:bookoninwiibin1 VTA_Class=VTA_n_Boundary ;
bwaawaabikibizh:bwaawaabikibin1 VTA_Class=VTA_n_Boundary ;
daatagikwebizh:daatagikwebin1 VTA_Class=VTA_n_Boundary ;
dakobizh:dakobin1 VTA_Class=VTA_n_Boundary ;
dasopizh:dasopin1 VTA_Class=VTA_n_Boundary ;
desaakwa'oozh:desaakwa'oon1 VTA_Class=VTA_n_Boundary ;
ditibibizh:ditibibin1 VTA_Class=VTA_n_Boundary ;
gaanjigwaazh:gaanjigwaan1 VTA_Class=VTA_n_Boundary ;
gagojipozh:gagojipon1 VTA_Class=VTA_n_Boundary ;
gakiiwewizh:gakiiwewin1 VTA_Class=VTA_n_Boundary ;
gawibizh:gawibin1 VTA_Class=VTA_n_Boundary ;
giboogwaazh:giboogwaan1 VTA_Class=VTA_n_Boundary ;
giiminazh:giiminan1 VTA_Class=VTA_n_Boundary ;
giishkikozh:giishkikon1 VTA_Class=VTA_n_Boundary ;
giiwitaagoozh:giiwitaagoon1 VTA_Class=VTA_n_Boundary ;
gijigikozh:gijigikon1 VTA_Class=VTA_n_Boundary ;
ginigawiganebizh:ginigawiganebin1 VTA_Class=VTA_n_Boundary ;
giziiyaabikibizh:giziiyaabikibin1 VTA_Class=VTA_n_Boundary ;
gotigojiibizh:gotigojiibin1 VTA_Class=VTA_n_Boundary ;
gwekibizh:gwekibin1 VTA_Class=VTA_n_Boundary ;
inaadizookaazh:inaadizookaan1 VTA_Class=VTA_n_Boundary ;
ishkobizh:ishkobin1 VTA_Class=VTA_n_Boundary ;
jaaga'oozh:jaaga'oon1 VTA_Class=VTA_n_Boundary ;
jiichiigaawiganebizh:jiichiigaawiganebin1 VTA_Class=VTA_n_Boundary ;
maada'azh:maada'an1 VTA_Class=VTA_n_Boundary ;
maajiiwizh:maajiiwin1 VTA_Class=VTA_n_Boundary ;
maanepizh:maanepin1 VTA_Class=VTA_n_Boundary ;
mamaajibizh:mamaajibin1 VTA_Class=VTA_n_Boundary ;
mamiikwaazh:mamiikwaan1 VTA_Class=VTA_n_Boundary ;
mashkimodegwaazh:mashkimodegwaan1 VTA_Class=VTA_n_Boundary ;
michiboozh:michiboon1 VTA_Class=VTA_n_Boundary ;
mikondiikaazh:mikondiikaan1 VTA_Class=VTA_n_Boundary ;
minogwaazh:minogwaan1 VTA_Class=VTA_n_Boundary ;
mookaabiigibizh:mookaabiigibin1 VTA_Class=VTA_n_Boundary ;
na'agoozh:na'agoon1 VTA_Class=VTA_n_Boundary ;
naadagaamo'oozh:naadagaame'oon1 VTA_Class=VTA_n_Boundary ;
naawibazh:naawiban1 VTA_Class=VTA_n_Boundary ;
nabonikepizh:nabonikepin1 VTA_Class=VTA_n_Boundary ;
nanaandobizh:nanaandobin1 VTA_Class=VTA_n_Boundary ;
nawajigwaazh:nawajigwaan1 VTA_Class=VTA_n_Boundary ;
niisaaboozh:niisaaboon1 VTA_Class=VTA_n_Boundary ;
niminaa'oozh:niminaa'oon1 VTA_Class=VTA_n_Boundary ;
noondewizh:noondewin1 VTA_Class=VTA_n_Boundary ;
ombibizh:ombibin1 VTA_Class=VTA_n_Boundary ;
opimebizh:opimebin1 VTA_Class=VTA_n_Boundary ;
wanagoozh:wanagoon1 VTA_Class=VTA_n_Boundary ;
wiikwegibizh:wiikwegibin1 VTA_Class=VTA_n_Boundary ;
zaga'oozh:zaga'oon1 VTA_Class=VTA_n_Boundary ;
zhaagawikozh:zhaagawikon1 VTA_Class=VTA_n_Boundary ;
zhinoodaaganibizh:zhinoodaaganibin1 VTA_Class=VTA_n_Boundary ;
zinigojiibizh:zinigojiibin1 VTA_Class=VTA_n_Boundary ;
